Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3523.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin U.S. HIGHWAY 12; GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $4,000,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the commissioner of transportation for a grant to the city of Independence for predesign, design, and construction of critical safety and mobility improvements along marked U.S. Highway 12 from County Line Road to County Road 90 in Hennepin County. This appropriation is for portions of the project that are eligible to be funded with general obligation bonds. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $4,000,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin U.S. HIGHWAY 12; TRUNK HIGHWAY BONDS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $16,000,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds account in the trunk highway fund to the commissioner of transportation for predesign, design, and construction of critical safety and mobility improvements along marked U.S. Highway 12 from County Line Road to County Road 90 in Hennepin County. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds account in the trunk highway fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $16,000,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 167.50 to 167.52, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XIV, section 11, at the times and in the amounts requested by the commissioner of transportation. The proceeds of the bonds, except accrued interest and any premium received from the sale of the bonds, must be deposited in the bond proceeds account in the trunk highway fund. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end